Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.250

Retired active license status.

The disciplining authority may adopt rules pursuant to this section authorizing a retired active license status. An individual credentialed by a disciplining authority regulated in the state under RCW 18.130.040, who is practicing only in emergent or intermittent circumstances as defined by rule established by the disciplining authority, may hold a retired active license at a reduced renewal fee established by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250 or, for a physician regulated pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW who resides and practices in Washington and holds a retired active license, at no renewal fee. Except as provided in RCW 18.71.080, such a license shall meet the continuing education or continued competency requirements, if any, established by the disciplining authority for renewals, and is subject to the provisions of this chapter. Individuals who have entered into retired status agreements with the disciplinary [disciplining] authority in any jurisdiction shall not qualify for a retired active license under this section.

[ 2009 c 403 s 3; 1991 c 229 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2009 c 403: See note following RCW 18.71.080.